fr: Nombre de fils de la surjeteuse: 2 fils; 2/3/4 fils; 2/3/4/5 fils; 3 fils; 3/4 fils; 4 fils; 5 fils; Autre
ru: Количество нитей оверлока: 2-ниточный; 2/3/4-ниточный; 2/3/4/5-ниточный; 3-ниточный; 3/4-ниточный; 4-ниточный; 5-ниточный; Другое
sk-SK: Počet nití používaných overlockovým strojom: 2-nitné; 2/3/4-nitné; 2/3/4/5-nitné; 3-nitné; 3/4-nitné; 4-nitné; 5-nitné; Iné
fi: Saumurin lankamäärä: 2-lankainen; 2/3/4-lankainen; 2/3/4/5-lankainen; 3-lankainen; 3/4-lankainen; 4-lankainen; 5-lankainen; Muu
pt-BR: Overloque número de fios: 2 fios; 2/3/4 fios; 2/3/4/5 fios; 3 fios; 3/4 fios; 4 fios; 5 fios; Outros
lt-LT: Overloko siūlų skaičius: 2 siūlų; 2 / 3 / 4 siūlų; 2 / 3 / 4 / 5 siūlų; 3 siūlų; 3 / 4 siūlų; 4 siūlų; 5 siūlų; Kita
nl: Lockmachine draadaantal: 2-draads; 2/3/4-draads; 2/3/4/5-draads; 3-draads; 3/4-draads; 4-draads; 5-draads; Overig
bg-BG: Брой конци на оверлог машината: 2-конечен; 2/3/4-конечен; 2/3/4/5-конечен; 3-конечен; 3/4-конечен; 4-конечен; 5-конечен; Друго
es: Cantidad de hilos de la remalladora: 2 hilos; 2/3/4 hilos; 2/3/4/5 hilos; 3 hilos; 3/4 hilos; 4 hilos; 5 hilos; Otro
vi: Số lượng sợi chỉ của máy may vắt sổ: 2 chỉ; 2/3/4 chỉ; 2/3/4/5 chỉ; 3 chỉ; 3/4 chỉ; 4 chỉ; 5 chỉ; Khác
sv: Antal trådar i overlockmaskinen: 2-trådig; 2/3/4-trådig; 2/3/4/5-trådig; 3-trådig; 3/4-trådig; 4-trådig; 5-trådig; Övrigt
nb: Serger-trådantall: 2-trådet; 2/3/4-trådet; 2/3/4/5-trådet; 3-trådet; 3/4-trådet; 4-trådet; 5-trådet; Annet
ko: 오버록 재봉틀 실 수: 2 스레드; 2/3/4 스레드; 2/3/4/5 스레드; 3 스레드; 3/4 스레드; 4 스레드; 5 스레드; 기타
ro-RO: Număr de fire pentru mașina de surfilat: 2 fire; 2/3/4 fire; 2/3/4/5 fire; 3 fire; 3/4 fire; 4 fire; 5 fire; Altele
zh-TW: 拷克機線數: 2 線; 2/3/4 線; 2/3/4/5 線; 3 線; 3/4 線; 4 線; 5 線; 其他
pl: Gęstość ściegu owerlokowego: 2-nitkowy; 2/3/4-nitkowy; 2/3/4/5-nitkowy; 3-nitkowy; 3/4-nitkowy; 4-nitkowy; 5-nitkowy; Inne
en: Serger thread count: 2-thread; 2/3/4-thread; 2/3/4/5-thread; 3-thread; 3/4-thread; 4-thread; 5-thread; Other
it: Numero di fili della tagliacuci: A 2 fili; A 2/3/4 fili; A 2/3/4/5 fili; A 3 fili; A 3/4 fili; A 4 fili; A 5 fili; Altro
cs: Počet vláken overlocku: 2nitný; 2/3/4nitný; 2/3/4/5nitný; 3nitný; 3/4nitný; 4nitný; 5nitný; Jiné
sl-SI: Število niti opletilnega šivalnega stroja: 2-nitni; 2-/3-/4-nitni; 2-/3-/4-/5-nitni; 3-nitni; 3-/4-nitni; 4-nitni; 5-nitni; Drugo
hr-HR: Broj poruka Sergera niz: 2 konca; 2/3/4 konca; 2/3/4/5 konaca; 3 konca; 3/4 konca; 4 konca; 5 konaca; Ostalo
el: Αριθμός νημάτων κοπτοράπτη: 2 κλωστών; 2/3/4 κλωστών; 2/3/4/5 κλωστών; 3 κλωστών; 3/4 κλωστών; 4 κλωστών; 5 κλωστών; Άλλο
tr: Overlok iplik sayısı: 2 iplikli; 2/3/4 iplikli; 2/3/4/5 iplikli; 3 iplikli; 3/4 iplikli; 4 iplikli; 5 iplikli; Diğer
de: Fadenanzahl der Overlockmaschine: 2-fädig; 2/3/4-fädig; 2/3/4/5-fädig; 3-fädig; 3/4-fädig; 4-fädig; 5-fädig; Andere
zh-CN: 包缝机穿线数量: 2 线; 2/3/4 线; 2/3/4/5 线; 3 线; 3/4 线; 4 线; 5 线; 其他
hu: Overlock szálak száma: 2 szálas; 2/3/4 szálas; 2/3/4/5 szálas; 3 szálas; 3/4 szálas; 4 szálas; 5 szálas; Egyéb
th: จำนวนเส้นด้ายของจักรเย็บผ้าแบบโอเวอร์ล็อก: 2 ด้าย; 2/3/4 ด้าย; 2/3/4/5 ด้าย; 3 ด้าย; 3/4 ด้าย; 4 ด้าย; 5 ด้าย; อื่นๆ
ja: ロックミシンの使用糸数: 2 本糸; 2/3/4 本糸; 2/3/4/5 本糸; 3 本糸; 3/4 本糸; 4 本糸; 5 本糸; その他
pt-PT: Número de fios da máquina de costura overloque: 2 fios; 2/3/4 fios; 2/3/4/5 fios; 3 fios; 3/4 fios; 4 fios; 5 fios; Outro
da: Overlockmaskines trådtal: 2-trådet; 2/3/4-trådet; 2/3/4/5-trådet; 3-trådet; 3/4-trådet; 4-trådet; 5-trådet; Andet